src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
! ========================================================================== !
!!                        !!!Pronominal morphology                           
! ========================================================================== !

!! !!Closed class personal pronouns
! ------------------------------

LEXICON PERS                        !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1: perssg1decl ;    !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ...
тэ+Pron+Pers+Sg2: perssg2decl ; 
сія+Pron+Pers+Sg3: perssg3decl ;
ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1: perspl1decl ;
ті+Pron+Pers+Pl2: perspl2decl ; 
нія+Pron+Pers+Pl3: perspl3decl ;

LEXICON PERS-SG1_
+Pron+Pers+Sg1: perssg1decl ;
LEXICON PERS-SG2_
+Pron+Pers+Sg2: perssg2decl ;
LEXICON PERS-SG3_
+Pron+Pers+Sg3: perssg3decl ;

LEXICON PERS-PL1_
+Pron+Pers+Pl1: perspl1decl ;
LEXICON PERS-PL2_
+Pron+Pers+Pl2: perspl2decl ;
LEXICON PERS-PL3_
+Pron+Pers+Pl3: perspl3decl ;

LEXICON perssg1decl   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !Postposition complement
+GenStem:нам WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+GenStem:нам GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Ela+PxSg1:нсьым WordEnd ; !The elative case is used in Sg1 and Sg2 
                 !for the functions of the ablative in other persons
+Dat:ным WordEnd ; !What should be done with the 4 dative forms?
+Dat:м WordEnd ;
+Dat:н WordEnd ;
:н DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
+Acc:нӧ WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Ins:намӧн WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Com:намкӧт WordEnd ;
+GenStem:нам CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ;
+GenStem+Inе:намын WordEnd ;
+GenStem:нам ELA_ісь-THEN-K ;
+GenStem+Ill:намӧ WordEnd ;
+GenStem:нам APR_сянь-THEN-K ;
+GenStem+Ter:намӧдз WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: perssg ; ! for the regular obl sg

LEXICON perspl1decl    !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Nom:йӧ WordEnd ;
+GenStem:ян WordEnd ;
+Acc:янӧс WordEnd ;
+GenStem:ян persplobl ;
!!Extras form 2000 Grammar: 163
+GenStem:ян GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ; !Synomymous with: миян
+GenStem+PxPl1+Acc:яннымӧс WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянӧс
+GenStem+Ela+PxPl1:янсьыным WordEnd ; !Synomymous with:миянлысь
+Com:кӧт WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянкӧт
+GenStem+PxPl1+Com:яннымкӧт WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянкӧт
CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ; !Synomymous with: миянтӧг
+GenStem+Car+PxPl1:янтӧгным WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянтӧг
+GenStem+PxPl1+Cns:яннымла WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянла
ELA_ісь-THEN-K ; !Synomymous with: миянысь
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянӧ
+GenStem+Apr+PxPl1:янланьным WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянлань
+Apr+PxPl1:ланьным WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянлань
+GenStem+Egr+PxPl1:янсяньным WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянсянь
+Tra:ті WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянӧд
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ; !Synomymous with: миянӧдз

LEXICON perssg2decl     !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Gen:нат WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+GenStem:нат WordEnd ;
+GenStem:нат GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:нсьыт WordEnd ;
+Dat:ныд WordEnd ;
+Dat:н WordEnd ;
+Dat:т WordEnd ;
:т DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
:н DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
:ныт DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
+Acc:нӧ WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Ins:натӧн WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Com:накӧт WordEnd ;
+GenStem:на CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ;
+GenStem+Ine:натын WordEnd ;
+GenStem:нат ELA_ісь-THEN-K ;
+GenStem+Ill:натӧ WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Egr:натсянь WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Ter:натӧдз WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: perssg ;  ! for the regular obl sg

LEXICON perspl2decl !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Nom:йӧ WordEnd ; !We need a special tag for discerning +Nom forms
+GenStem:ян WordEnd ;
+GenStem:ян GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Acc:янӧс WordEnd ;
+GenStem:ян persplobl ;
!More forms from Ӧнія коми кыв 2000: 163
+GenStem+Abl+PxPl2:янлысьныд WordEnd ;
+GenStem:ян DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
+GenStem+PxPl2+PxSg2+Acc2:янныдтӧ WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн WordEnd ;
+GenStem+PxPl2+Car:янныдтӧг WordEnd ;
CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ;
+GenStemPxPl2+Cns:янныдла WordEnd ;
ELA_ісь-THEN-K ;
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Apr+PxPl2:янланьныд WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Apr+PxSg2:янланьыд WordEnd ;
+GenStem+Egr+PxPl2:янсяньныд WordEnd ;
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ;

LEXICON perssg3decl  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+Nom:ія WordEnd ;
+Cmpl:ы GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Cmpl+Abl:ылісь WordEnd ;
+Cmpl:ы ELA_ісь-THEN-K ;
+Cmpl:ы DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ+Acc:ійӧс WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Ins:ійӧн WordEnd ;
+Cmpl:ы perssg ;  ! for the regular obl sg
+Cmpl:ы WordEnd ;
!More form ӧния коми кыв 163
+Der/йӧ:ійӧ GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ+Abl:ійӧлісь WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ:ійӧ DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ+Com:ійӧкӧт WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ:ійӧ CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ:ійӧ APR_сянь-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ+Egr:ійӧсянь WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Egr+PxSg3:ійӧсяньыс WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Ter:ійӧӧдз WordEnd ;
! Special expressions
+Cmpl+Com+Ins:ыкӧтӧн WordEnd ; ! Ен сыкӧтӧн!

!! ми мийӧ The 1st and 2nd persons have Oblique case stem strategies
!! that differ from the 3rd person: 
!! ті тійӧ nämä ovat aivan eri asioita
!! сы сійӧ tosin joskus 

LEXICON perspl3decl !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Nom:ія WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Acc:ійӧ WordEnd ;

+Der/йӧ+Acc:найӧс WordEnd ;
+Cmpl:на GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Cmpl:ы persplobl ; !This might be one solution for the different stem types
+Cmpl:ы WordEnd ;
!
+Der/йӧ:найӧ GEN_лӧн-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ+Abl:найӧлісь WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ:найӧ DAT_лӧ-THEN-K ;
+Der/йӧ+Ins:найӧӧн WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ+Com:найӧкӧт WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+Com:накӧтыс WordEnd ;
+Der/йӧ:найӧ CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ;
+Cmpl+Car+PxSg3:натӧгыс WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+PxSg3+Cns:наысла WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+Ela+PxSg3:насьыс WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+PxSg3+Apr:наыслань WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+Apr+PxSg3:наланьыс WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+PxSg3+Egr:наыссянь WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+Egr+PxSg3:насяньыс WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+Tra+PxSg3:натіыс WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+Ter+PxSg3:наӧдзыс WordEnd ;


LEXICON perssg !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Ins:ӧн WordEnd ;
+Com:кӧт WordEnd ;
CAR_тӧг-THEN-K ;
+Cns:ла WordEnd ;
+Ine:ын WordEnd ;
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ; !
ELA_ісь-THEN-K ;
APR_сянь-THEN-K ;
+Egr:сянь WordEnd ;
+Prl:ӧд WordEnd ;
+Tra:ті WordEnd ;
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ;
+Abl:лісь WordEnd ; !This is not attested for Sg1 and Sg2 in the 2000 Grammar
