src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
ме:ме PERS-SG1_  "(kpv)..ме:ме.." ;
тэ:тэ PERS-SG2_  "(kpv)..тэ:тэ.." ;
сія:с PERS-SG3_  "(kpv)..сійӧ:сы PRONDEMTAG.." ;
ми:ми PERS-PL1_  "(kpv)..ми:ми.." ; 
ті:ті PERS-PL2_  "(kpv)..ті:ті.." ;
нія:н PERS-PL3_  "(kpv)..найӧ:на.." ;
